Utah statutes.
17-8-1.   Powers of county -- Contracts with United States -- Construction of flood control project.

A county may contract with the United States of America, or any agency thereof, for the construction of any flood control project within the county designed to abate or control flood waters or any excessive or unusual accumulation of water in any natural or artificial basin, stream, or body of water or for the protection of life and property against the danger, menace, injury or damage resulting from said waters.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

